North Dakota statutes. TITLE 16.1 Elections
CHAPTER 16.1-08.1 Campaign Contribution Statements

16.1-08.1-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Affiliate” means an organization that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another organization. For purposes of this definition, control means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of an organization, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or otherwise. Control is presumed to exist if an organization, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies representing fifty percent or more of the voting securities of any other organization.

“Association” means any club, association, union, brotherhood, fraternity, organization, or group of any kind of two or more persons, including labor unions, trade associations, professional associations, or governmental associations, which is united for any purpose, business, or object and which assesses any dues, membership fees, or license fees in any amount, or which maintains a treasury fund in any amount. The term does not include corporations, cooperative corporations, limited liability companies, political committees, or political parties.

“Conduit” means a person that is not a political party, political committee, or candidate and which receives a contribution of money and transfers the contribution to a candidate, political party, or political committee when the contribution is designated specifically for the candidate, political party, or political committee and the person has no discretion as to the recipient and the amount transferred. The term includes a transactional intermediary, including a credit card company or a money transfer service that pays or transfers money to a candidate on behalf of another person.

“Contribution” means a gift, transfer, conveyance, provision, receipt, subscription, loan, advance, deposit of money, or anything of value, made for the purpose of influencing the nomination for election, or election, of any person to public office or aiding or opposing the circulation or passage of a statewide initiative or referendum petition or measure. The term also means a contract, promise, or agreement, express or implied, whether or not legally enforceable, to make a contribution for any of the above purposes. The term includes funds received by a candidate for public office or a political party or committee which are transferred or signed over to that candidate, party, or committee from another candidate, party, or political committee or other source including a conduit. The term “anything of value” includes any good or service of more than a nominal value. The term “nominal value” means the cost, price, or worth of the good or service is trivial, token, or of no appreciable value. The term “contribution” does not include:

A loan of money from a bank or other lending institution made in the regular course of business.

Time spent by volunteer campaign or political party workers.

Money or anything of value received for commercial transactions, including rents, advertising, or sponsorships made as a part of a fair market value bargained-for exchange.

Money or anything of value received for anything other than a political purpose.

Products or services for which the actual cost or fair market value are reimbursed by a payment of money.

An independent expenditure.

The value of advertising paid by a political party, multicandidate political committee, or caucus which is in support of a candidate.

In-kind contributions from a candidate to the candidate’s campaign.

“Cooperative corporations”, “corporations”, and “limited liability companies” are as defined in this code, and for purposes of this chapter “corporations” includes nonprofit corporations. However, if a political committee, the only purpose of which is accepting contributions and making expenditures for a political purpose, incorporates for liability purposes only, the committee is not considered a corporation for the purposes of this chapter.

“Expenditure” means:

A gift, transfer, conveyance, provision, loan, advance, payment, distribution, disbursement, outlay, or deposit of money or anything of value, except a loan of money from a bank or other lending institution made in the regular course of business, made for a political purpose or for the purpose of influencing the passage or defeat of a measure.

A contract, promise, or agreement, express or implied, whether or not legally enforceable, to make any expenditure.

The transfer of funds by a political committee to another political committee.

An independent expenditure.

“Expenditure categories” means the categories into which expenditures must be grouped for reports under this chapter. The expenditure categories are:

Advertising;

Campaign loan repayment;

Operations;

Travel; and

Miscellaneous.

“Independent expenditure” means an expenditure made for a political purpose or for the purpose of influencing the passage or defeat of a measure if the expenditure is made without the express or implied consent, authorization, or cooperation of, and not in concert with or at the request or suggestion of, any candidate, committee, or political party.

“Patron” means a person who owns equity interest in the form of stock, shares, or membership or maintains similar financial rights in a cooperative corporation.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, political committee, association, corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, or other organization or group of persons.

“Personal benefit” means a benefit to the candidate or another person which is not for a political purpose or related to a candidate’s responsibilities as a public officeholder, and any other benefit that would convert a contribution to personal income.

“Political committee” means any committee, club, association, or other group of persons which receives contributions or makes expenditures for political purposes and includes:

A political action committee not connected to another organization and free to solicit funds from the general public, or derived from a corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or an association that solicits or receives contributions from its employees or members or makes expenditures for political purposes on behalf of its employees or members;

A candidate committee established to support an individual candidate seeking public office which solicits or receives contributions for political purposes;

A political organization registered with the federal election commission, which solicits or receives contributions or makes expenditures for political purposes;

A multicandidate political committee, including a caucus, established to support multiple groups or slates of candidates seeking public office, which solicits or receives contributions for political purposes; and

A measure committee, including an initiative or referendum sponsoring committee at any stage of its organization, which solicits or receives contributions or makes expenditures for the purpose of aiding or opposing a measure sought to be voted upon by the voters of the state, including any activities undertaken for the purpose of drafting an initiative or referendum petition, seeking approval of the secretary of state for the circulation of a petition, or seeking approval of the submitted petitions.

“Political party” means any association, committee, or organization which nominates a candidate for election to any office which may be filled by a vote of the electors of this state or any of its political subdivisions and whose name appears on the election ballot as the candidate of such association, committee, or organization.

“Political purpose” means any activity undertaken in support of or in opposition to the election or nomination of a candidate to public office and includes using “vote for”, “oppose”, or any similar support or opposition language in any advertisement whether the activity is undertaken by a candidate, a political committee, a political party, or any person. In the period thirty days before a primary election and sixty days before a special or general election, “political purpose” also means any activity in which a candidate’s name, office, district, or any term meaning the same as “incumbent” or “challenger” is used in support of or in opposition to the election or nomination of a candidate to public office. The term does not include activities undertaken in the performance of a duty of a public office or any position taken in any bona fide news story, commentary, or editorial.

“Public office” means every office to which an individual can be elected by vote of the people under the laws of this state.

“Subsidiary” means an affiliate of a corporation under the control of the corporation directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries.

“Ultimate and true source” means the person that knowingly contributed over two hundred dollars solely to influence a statewide election or an election for the legislative assembly.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 244, § 1; 1983, ch. 245, § 2; 1987, ch. 250, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 207, § 9; 1997, ch. 194, § 1; 1999, ch. 50, § 35; 1999, ch. 204, § 3; 2001, ch. 202, § 2; 2003, ch. 176, § 1; 2003, ch. 177, § 1; 2005, ch. 188, § 1; 2007, ch. 194, § 1; 2007, ch. 193, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 1; 2011, ch. 155, § 1; 2013, ch. 171, § 1; 2013, ch. 172, § 1; 2015, ch. 159, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 163, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 155, § 1, effective February 1, 2018; 2019, ch. 472, § 1, effective January 5, 2021; 2021, ch. 164, § 45, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 163, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 159, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 15 of chapter 155, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This section applies to campaign years beginning after December 31, 2017.”

Section 16.1-08.1-01 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 163, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2299; and Section 2 of Chapter 159, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1309.

Law Reviews.

North Dakota’s New Election Code, 57 N.D. L. Rev. 427 (1981).

Note: What Is a Candidate? What Is a Contribution? An Analysis of How North Dakota’s New Campaign Finance Definitions Compare to the Rest of the States, 80 N.D. L. Rev. 441 (2004).

A Conundrum in a Quagmire: Unraveling North Dakota’s Campaign Finance Law, 82 N.D. L. Rev. 1 (2006).

Case Comment: Constitutional Law — Elections: Citizens Divided: Balancing the First Amendment Right to Free Speech and the Role Of Private Corporations in Our Nation’s Elections: Citizens United v. Federal Election Commission, 130 S. Ct. 876 (2010), see
86 N.D. L. Rev. 619 (2010).

16.1-08.1-02.
Contributions statement required of candidate committees, candidates, and candidates for legislative office. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 244, § 2; 1983, ch. 244, § 2; 1983, ch. 245, § 3; 1993, ch. 212, § 2; 1995, ch. 207, § 11; 1997, ch. 194, § 2; 1999, ch. 204, § 4; 2003, ch. 176, § 2; 2005, ch. 188, § 2; 2013, ch. 172, § 2; Repealed by 2017, ch. 155, § 13, eff February 1, 2018.

16.1-08.1-02.1.
State political party convention revenue and expense statement required.

State political parties shall establish separate and segregated accounts for the management of state nominating conventions. All revenue obtained and expenditures made for the planning and running of a state convention must be accounted for in these accounts.

A postconvention statement must be filed with the secretary of state sixty days after the close of the state nominating convention. The reporting period for the postconvention statement begins on the first day of January of the reporting year and ends thirty days after the close of the state nominating convention.

A year-end statement covering the entire calendar year must be filed with the secretary of state before February first of the following year even if no convention revenue was received or expenditures made within the calendar year.

The statement filed according to this section must show the following:

The balance of the filer’s convention accounts at the start and close of the reporting period;

The total of all revenue received and expenditures made of two hundred dollars, or less;

The total of all revenue received and expenditures made in excess of two hundred dollars;

For each aggregated revenue received from a person in excess of two hundred dollars:

The name of each person;

The mailing address of each person;

The date of the most recent receipt of revenue from each person; and

The purpose or purposes for which the aggregated revenue total was received from each person;

For each aggregated expenditure made to a person in excess of two hundred dollars:

The name of each person or entity;

The mailing address of each person or entity;

The date of the most recent expense made to each person or entity; and

The purpose or purposes for which the aggregated expenditure total was disbursed to each person or entity; and

For each aggregated revenue from an individual which totals five thousand dollars or more during the reporting period, the occupation, employer, and principal place of business of the individual must be disclosed.

If a net gain from the convention is transferred to the accounts established for the support of the nomination or election of candidates, the total transferred must be reported as a contribution in the statements required by section 16.1-08.1-02.4.

If a net loss from the convention is covered by a transfer from the accounts established for the support of the nomination or election of candidates, the total transferred must be reported as an expenditure in the statements required by section 16.1-08.1-02.4.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 194, § 2; 2017, ch. 155, § 2, effective February 1, 2018.

Note.

Section 15 of chapter 155, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This section applies to campaign years beginning after December 31, 2017.”

16.1-08.1-02.2.
State political party building fund statement required.

A state political party or nonprofit entity affiliated with or under the control of a state political party which receives a donation for purchasing, maintaining, or renovating a building shall file a statement with the secretary of state before February first of each calendar year. Any income or financial gain generated from a building purchased, maintained, or renovated from donations must be deposited in the building fund and must be disclosed when the political party or nonprofit entity files the statement required under this section. Money in the fund may be used only by the state political party or nonprofit entity affiliated with or under the control of a state political party for purchasing, maintaining, or renovating a building including the purchase of fixtures for the building. The statement may be submitted for filing beginning on January first and must include:

The balance of the building fund on January first;

The name and mailing address of each donor;

The amount of each donation;

The date each donation was received;

The name and mailing address of each recipient of an expenditure;

The amount of each expenditure;

The date each expenditure was made; and

The balance of the fund on December thirty-first.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 155, § 3, effective February 1, 2018.

Note.

Section 15 of chapter 155, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This section applies to campaign years beginning after December 31, 2017.”

16.1-08.1-02.3.
Pre-election, supplemental, and year-end campaign disclosure statement requirements for candidates, candidate committees, multicandidate committees, and nonstatewide political parties.

Prior to the thirty-first day before a primary, general, or special election, a candidate or candidate committee formed on behalf of the candidate, a multicandidate political committee, or a political party other than a statewide political party soliciting or accepting contributions shall file a campaign disclosure statement that includes all contributions received from January first through the fortieth day before the election. A candidate whose name is not on the ballot and who is not seeking election through write-in votes, the candidate’s candidate committee, and a political party that has not endorsed or nominated any candidate in the election is not required to file a statement under this subsection. The statement may be submitted for filing beginning on the thirty-ninth day before the election. The statement must include:

For each aggregated contribution from a contributor which totals in excess of two hundred dollars received during the reporting period:

The name and mailing address of the contributor;

The total amount of the contribution; and

The date the last contributed amount was received;

The total of all aggregated contributions from contributors which total in excess of two hundred dollars during the reporting period;

The total of all contributions received from contributors that contributed two hundred dollars or less each during the reporting period; and

For a statewide candidate, a candidate committee formed on behalf of a statewide candidate, and a statewide multicandidate committee, the balance of the campaign fund on the fortieth day before the election and the balance of the campaign fund on January first .

Beginning on the thirty-ninth day before the election through the day before the election, a person that files a statement under subsection 1 must file a supplemental statement within forty-eight hours of the start of the day following the receipt of a contribution or aggregate contribution from a contributor which is in excess of five hundred dollars. The statement must include:

The name and mailing address of the contributor;

The total amount of the contribution received during the reporting period; and

The date the last contributed amount was received.

Prior to February first, a candidate or candidate committee, a multicandidate political committee, or a nonstatewide political party soliciting or accepting contributions shall file a campaign disclosure statement that includes all contributions received and expenditures, by expenditure category, made from January first through December thirty-first of the previous year. The statement may be submitted for filing beginning on January first. The statement must include:

For a statewide candidate, a candidate committee formed on behalf of a statewide candidate, and a statewide multicandidate committee, the balance of the campaign fund on January first and on December thirty-first;

For each aggregated contribution from a contributor which totals in excess of two hundred dollars received during the reporting period:

The name and mailing address of the contributor;

The total amount of the contribution; and

The date the last contributed amount was received;

The total of all aggregated contributions from contributors which total in excess of two hundred dollars during the reporting period;

The total of all contributions received from contributors that contributed two hundred dollars or less each during the reporting period; and

The total of all other expenditures made during the previous year, separated into expenditure categories.

A person required to file a statement under this section, other than a candidate for judicial office, county office, or city office, or a candidate committee for a candidate exempted under this subsection, shall report each aggregated contribution from a contributor which totals five thousand dollars or more during the reporting period. For these contributions from individuals, the statement must include the contributor’s occupation, employer, and the employer’s principal place of business.

A candidate for city office in a city with a population under five thousand and a candidate committee for the candidate are exempt from this section.

A candidate for county office and a candidate committee for a candidate for county office shall file statements under this chapter with the county auditor. A candidate for city office who is required to file a statement under this chapter and a candidate committee for such a candidate shall file statements with the city auditor. Any other person required to file a statement under this section shall file the statement with the secretary of state.

The filing officer shall assess and collect fees for any reports filed after the filing deadline.

To ensure accurate reporting and avoid commingling of campaign and personal funds, candidates shall use dedicated campaign accounts that are separate from any personal accounts.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 155, § 4, effective February 1, 2018.

Note.

Section 15 of chapter 155, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This section applies to campaign years beginning after December 31, 2017.”

16.1-08.1-02.4.
Pre-election, supplemental, and year-end campaign disclosure statement requirements for statewide political parties and certain political committees.

Prior to the thirty-first day before a primary, general, or special election, a statewide political party or a political committee not required to file statements under section 16.1-08.1-02.3 which is soliciting or accepting contributions shall file a campaign disclosure statement that includes all contributions received and expenditures made from January first through the fortieth day before the election. A political party that has not endorsed or nominated a candidate in an election is not required to file a statement under this subsection. A statement required to be filed under this subsection may be submitted for filing beginning on the thirty-ninth day before the election. The statement must include:

For each aggregated contribution from a contributor which totals in excess of two hundred dollars received during the reporting period:

The name and mailing address of the contributor;

The total amount of the contribution; and

The date the last contributed amount was received;

The total of all aggregated contributions from contributors which total in excess of two hundred dollars during the reporting period;

The total of all contributions received from contributors that contributed two hundred dollars or less each during the reporting period;

For each recipient of an expenditure from campaign funds in excess of two hundred dollars in the aggregate:

The name and mailing address of the recipient;

The total amount of the expenditure made to the recipient; and

The date the last expended amount was made to the recipient;

The aggregate total of all expenditures from campaign funds in excess of two hundred dollars;

The aggregate total of all expenditures from campaign funds of two hundred dollars or less; and

The balance of the campaign fund on the fortieth day before the election and balance of the campaign fund on January first.

Beginning on the thirty-ninth day before the election through the day before the election, a person that files a statement under subsection 1 must file a supplemental statement within forty-eight hours of the start of the day following the receipt of a contribution or aggregate contribution from a contributor which is in excess of five hundred dollars. The statement must include:

The name and mailing address of the contributor;

The total amount of the contribution received during the reporting period; and

The date the last contributed amount was received.

Prior to February first, a statewide political party or a political committee that is not required to file a statement under section 16.1-08.1-02.3 shall file a campaign disclosure statement that includes all contributions received and expenditures made from January first through December thirty-first of the previous year. The statement may be submitted for filing beginning on January first. The statement must include:

For each aggregated contribution from a contributor which totals in excess of two hundred dollars received during the reporting period:

The name and mailing address of the contributor;

The total amount of the contribution; and

The date the last contributed amount was received;

The total of all aggregated contributions from contributors which total in excess of two hundred dollars during the reporting period;

The total of all contributions received from contributors that contributed two hundred dollars or less each during the reporting period;

For each recipient of an expenditure from campaign funds in excess of two hundred dollars in the aggregate:

The name and mailing address of the recipient;

The total amount of the expenditure made to the recipient; and

The date the last expended amount was made to the recipient;

The aggregate total of all expenditures from campaign funds in excess of two hundred dollars;

The aggregate total of all expenditures from campaign funds of two hundred dollars or less; and

The balance of the campaign fund on January first and December thirty-first.

A person required to file a statement under this section shall disclose each aggregated contribution from a contributor which totals five thousand dollars or more during the reporting period. For these contributions from individuals, the statement must include the contributor’s occupation, employer, and the employer’s principal place of business.

Statements under this section must be filed with the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall assess and collect fees for any reports filed after the filing deadline.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 155, § 5, effective February 1, 2018.

Note.

Section 15 of chapter 155, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This section applies to campaign years beginning after December 31, 2017.”

16.1-08.1-03.
Contributions statement required of political parties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 244, § 3; 1983, ch. 244, § 3; 1983, ch. 245, § 4; 1993, ch. 212, § 3; 1995, ch. 207, § 12; 1997, ch. 194, § 3; 1999, ch. 204, § 5; 2003, ch. 176, § 3; 2005, ch. 188, § 3; 2013, ch. 172, § 3; Repealed by 2017, ch. 155, § 13, eff February 1, 2018.

16.1-08.1-03.1.
Special requirements for statements required of persons engaged in activities regarding ballot measures.

For each reportable contribution and expenditure under section 16.1-08.1-02.4, the threshold for reporting is one hundred dollars for any person engaged in activities described in subdivision e of subsection 12 of section 16.1-08.1-01.

For contributions received from any contributor, a person engaged in activities described in subdivision e of subsection 12 of section 16.1-08.1-01 shall include the following information regarding each subcontributor that has stated a contribution is for the express purpose of furthering the passage or defeat of a ballot measure in the statements required under section 16.1-08.1-02.4:

A designation as to whether any person contributed in excess of one hundred dollars of the total contribution;

The name and mailing address of each subcontributor that contributed in excess of one hundred dollars of the total contribution;

The contribution amounts of each disclosed subcontributor; and

The occupation, employer, and address for the employer’s principal place of business of each disclosed subcontributor.

An initiative and referendum sponsoring committee also shall file a disclosure statement by the date the secretary of state approves the petition for circulation, and shall file an additional statement on the date the petitions containing the required number of signatures are submitted to the secretary of state for review. The statements required under this subsection must be in the same form as the year-end statements under section 16.1-08.1-02.4.

A sponsoring committee shall file a statement regarding its intent to compensate circulators before paying for petitions to be circulated.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 250, § 2; 1993, ch. 212, § 4; 1995, ch. 207, § 13; 1995, ch. 208, § 1; 1997, ch. 194, § 4; 1997, ch. 195, § 1; 2001, ch. 202, § 3; 2003, ch. 176, § 4; 2005, ch. 188, § 4; 2011, ch. 156, § 1; 2013, ch. 172, § 4; 2013, ch. 174, § 1; 2015, ch. 159, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 2, § 5, effective July 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 155, § 6, effective February 1, 2018; 2019, ch. 176, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 164, § 46, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 3 of chapter 159, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 15 of chapter 155, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This section applies to campaign years beginning after December 31, 2017.”

Section 16.1-08.1-03.1 was amended 3 times by the Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 6 of Chapter 155, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2343; Section 1 of Chapter 156, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1362; and Section 5 of Chapter 2, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1002.

16.1-08.1-03.2.
Political committee and candidate registration.

A political committee as defined in section 16.1-08.1-01 shall register its name and contact information, its agent’s name and contact information, and a designation as to whether the committee is incorporated solely for the purpose of liability protection, with the secretary of state. A candidate who does not have a candidate committee shall register the candidate’s name and contact information and, if the candidate has an agent, the agent’s name and contact information with the secretary of state. The registration required under this section for a candidate or political committee that has not previously registered with the secretary of state must be submitted within fifteen business days of the receipt of any contribution or expenditure made.

A candidate or political committee required to be registered under this section must register with the secretary of state each year during which the candidate holds public office or during which the political committee receives contributions, makes expenditures for political purposes, or has a balance in the campaign account. An individual who no longer holds public office or an individual who no longer seeks public office must register with the secretary of state each year in which contributions are received, expenditures are made for political purposes, or has a balance in the campaign account.

A political committee that organizes and registers according to federal law and makes an independent expenditure or makes a disbursement in excess of two hundred dollars to a nonfederal candidate seeking public office, a political party, or political committee in this state is not required to register as a political committee according to this section if the political committee reports according to section 16.1-08.1-03.7.

Registration by a political committee under this section does not reserve the name for exclusive use nor does it constitute registration of a trade name under chapter 47-25.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 207, § 10; 1997, ch. 194, § 5; 1999, ch. 204, § 6; 2003, ch. 176, § 5; 2005, ch. 188, § 5; 2007, ch. 194, § 3; 2009, ch. 184, § 2; 2013, ch. 172, § 5; 2015, ch. 159, § 4, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 155, § 7, effective February 1, 2018.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 159, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 15 of chapter 155, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This section applies to campaign years beginning after December 31, 2017.”

16.1-08.1-03.3.
Campaign contributions by corporations, cooperative corporations, limited liability companies, affiliates, subsidiaries, and associations — Violation — Penalty — Political action committees authorized.

A corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association may establish, administer, and solicit contributions to a separate and segregated fund to be utilized for political purposes by the corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association. It is unlawful for:

The person or persons controlling the fund to make contributions or expenditures utilizing money or anything of value secured by physical force, job discrimination, financial reprisals, or the threat of them; or utilize money from dues, fees, treasury funds, or other money required as a condition of membership in an association, or as a condition of employment; or utilize money obtained in any commercial transaction. Moneys from fees, dues, treasury funds, or money obtained in a commercial transaction may, however, be used to pay costs of administration of the fund.

Any person soliciting an employee, stockholder, patron, board member, or member for a contribution to the fund to fail to inform the employee or member of the political purposes of the fund at the time of the solicitation or of the general political philosophy intended to be advanced through committee activities.

Any person soliciting an employee or member for a contribution to the fund to fail to inform the employee or member at the time of the solicitation of the right to refuse to contribute without any reprisal.

Any contribution to be accepted without keeping an accurate record of the contributor and amount contributed and of amounts expended for political purposes.

Any contribution to be accepted from any person not an employee, a stockholder, a patron, a board member or a member of the corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association maintaining the political action committee, except a corporation may accept a contribution from an employee, a stockholder, a patron, a board member, or a member of an affiliate or a subsidiary of the corporation.

Any expenditure made for political purposes to be reported under this section before control of the expenditure has been released by the political action committee except if there is a contract, a promise, or an agreement, expressed or implied, to make such expenditure.

A person may not make a payment of that person’s money or of another person’s money to any other person for a political purpose in any name other than that of the person that supplies the money and a person may not knowingly receive the payment nor enter nor cause the payment to be entered in that person’s account or record in any name other than that of the person by which it actually was furnished.

If an officer, employee, agent, attorney, or other representative of a corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association makes any contribution prohibited by this section out of corporate, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association funds or otherwise violates this section, it is prima facie evidence of a violation by the corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association.

A violation of this section may be prosecuted in the county where the contribution is made or in any county in which it has been paid or distributed.

It is a class A misdemeanor for an officer, director, stockholder, manager, governor, member, attorney, agent, or representative of any corporation, cooperative corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association to violate this section or to counsel or consent to any violation. Any person that solicits or knowingly receives any contribution in violation of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Any officer, director, stockholder, manager, governor, member, attorney, agent, or representative who makes, counsels, or consents to the making of a contribution in violation of this section is liable to the company, corporation, limited liability company, affiliate, subsidiary, or association for the amount so contributed.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 207, § 14; 1997, ch. 194, § 6; 1999, ch. 204, § 7; 2001, ch. 202, § 4; 2003, ch. 176, § 6; 2007, ch. 194, § 4; 2011, ch. 155, § 2; 2013, ch. 171, § 2; 2013, ch. 172, § 6; 2017, ch. 155, § 8, effective February 1, 2018.

Note.

Section 15 of chapter 155, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. This section applies to campaign years beginning after December 31, 2017.”

Collateral References.

Constitutional Validity of State or Local Regulation of Contributions by or to Political Action Committees. 24 A.L.R.6th 179.

Construction and Application of Supreme Court’s Holding in

Citizens United v. Federal Election Com’n,

130 S. Ct. 876, 175 L. Ed. 2d 753, 187 L.R.R.M. (BNA) 2961, 159 Lab. Cas. (CCH) P 10166 (2010), That Government May Not Prohibit Independent and Indirect Corporate Expenditures on Political Speech. 65 A.L.R.6th 503.

Construction and Application of Supreme Court’s Holding in

Citizens United v. Federal Election Com’n,

130 S. Ct. 876, 558 U.S. 310, 175 L. Ed. 2d 753, 187 L.R.R.M. (BNA) 2961, 159 Lab. Cas. (CCH) P 10166 (2010), That Government May Not Prohibit Independent and Indirect Corporate Expenditures on Political Speech. 65 A.L.R.6th 503.

Law Reviews.

A Conundrum in a Quagmire: Unraveling North Dakota’s Campaign Finance Law, 82 N.D. L. Rev. 1 (2006).

Case Comment: Constitutional Law — Elections: Citizens Divided: Balancing the First Amendment Right to Free Speech and the Role Of Private Corporations in Our Nation’s Elections: Citizens United v. Federal Election Commission, 130 S. Ct. 876 (2010), see 86 N.D. L. Rev. 619 (2010).

16.1-08.1-03.4.
Person not excused from testifying as to violation — Prosecution or penalty waived upon testifying.

No person may be excused from attending and testifying or producing any books, papers, or other documents before any court upon any investigation, proceeding, or trial for a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, upon the grounds that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of the person may tend to incriminate or degrade the person. No person may be prosecuted nor subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which the person may testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, and no testimony so given or produced may be used against the person in any criminal investigation or proceeding.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 207, § 15.